Utah statutes.
4-31-118.   Animal disease traceability.

The department may:

(1)  make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that are necessary for animal disease traceability and compliance with federal law regarding animal disease traceability; and

(2)  enforce the rules described in Subsection (1).

